Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-960
Charges; protest; hearing; appeal.

If any person is dissatisfied with the amount of any charge made against him or her by a control authority for control work or for the purchase of materials or use of equipment, he or she may, within fifteen days after being advised of the amount of the charge, file a protest with the county board. The county board shall hold a hearing to determine whether the charges were appropriate, taking into consideration whether the control measures were conducted in a timely fashion. Following the hearing, the county board shall have the power to adjust or affirm such charge. If any person is dissatisfied with the decision of the county board or with charges made by the county board for control work performed, such person may appeal the decision, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1965, c. 7, § 9, p. 85;

Laws 1975, LB 14, § 8;

Laws 1982, LB 697, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 138, § 9;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 2.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.